New Jersey, session 221, A3009.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a child care center licensed pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1983, c.492 (C.30:5B-1 et seq.) shall prepare and make available a notice of any change in the tuition rate charged by the center, 45 days prior to the change, to every parent or legal guardian of a child attending the center.  The notice shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested or by receipted first class mail addressed to the parent or legal guardian at the last known address identified in the child care centers records, or shall be delivered in person to the parent or legal guardian by a staff member of the center.  The notice shall be posted on the child care centers internet website or by other electronic means, and shall be displayed in a prominent location within the center. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately